Tennessee, session 114, SB0166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-506(28)(A), is amended by
adding the following language as a new subdivision:
(iii) Effective September 1, 2025, there is created in the twenty-eighth judicial
district one (1) additional circuit court. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as
judge of the circuit court created by this subdivision (28)(A)(iii). The person so appointed
shall serve in that capacity until September 1, 2026, or until the person's successor is
elected and qualified. At the August 2026 general election, the qualified voters of the
twenty-eighth judicial district shall elect, in accordance with § 16-2-505, one (1) person
to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this subdivision (28)(A)(iii). The person
so elected at the August 2026 general election shall hold office until September 1, 2030,
or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, the judge of the
circuit court created by this subdivision (28)(A)(iii) must be elected for a full eight-year
term.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0166
001657
- 1 -